District of Columbia statutes.
7-1206.02

Notice requirement — Employees and agents with access to information.

Mental health professionals, mental health facilities and data collectors shall provide employees and agents who have lawful access to mental health information in the course of their employment with a written statement of the requirement of maintaining the security of records of mental health information and of the penalties provided in this chapter for unauthorized disclosure.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-136, § 602, 25 DCR 5055

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2052.
1973 Ed., § 6-1639.